Vermont, session 2025-2026, H154.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. LEGISLATIVE INTENT
It is the intent of the General Assembly to honor the special value of the
military service that the veterans of the U.S. Armed Forces have contributed to
the security and well-being of our nation by designating November as the
Vermont Month of the Veteran.
Sec. 2. 1 V.S.A. § 378 is added to read:
§ 378. VERMONT MONTH OF THE VETERAN
November of each year is designated as the Vermont Month of the Veteran.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
Date Governor signed bill: April 15, 2025
VT LEG #383134 v.1